Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 9A Railway Passenger Service Corridor System

Cross references.

Railroad companies as motor common carriers, Ch. 7, T. 46.

Railroad companies as motor common carriers, Ch. 8, T. 46.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1699, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds and declares as follows: (1) The establishment of railway passenger service to the general public and connecting points within and throughout this state and to nearby states will develop and promote, for the public good and general welfare of this state, trade, commerce, tourism, industry, and employment opportunities while alleviating highway traffic congestion and related air pollution. (2) Any implementation of such railway passenger service which meets the needs and promotes the general welfare of this state as a whole while making the best and most efficient use of resources requires a system of railway passenger service corridors which is comprehensive and coordinated for purposes of state planning and development of service. (3) It is therefore in the public interest and is vital to the public welfare of the people of Georgia, and it is declared to be the public purpose of this Act, to establish such a system of railway passenger service corridors provided by Code Section 46-9-290 as enacted by this Act.”

46-9-290.
Designated Georgia Rail Passenger Corridors.

For purposes of state planning and development of service there is created a comprehensive and coordinated state-wide system of railway passenger service corridors for providing railway passenger service to the general public and connecting points within and throughout this state and to nearby states, which shall be known as the Designated Georgia Rail Passenger Corridors and shall include the following:

Atlanta-Athens;

Atlanta-Hartsfield International Airport-Macon;

Macon-Jesup-Brunswick;

Macon-Americus-Albany;

Macon-Houston County-Valdosta;

Macon-Douglas-Waycross-Jacksonville, Florida;

Macon-Savannah;

Atlanta-Columbus;

Atlanta-Augusta;

Atlanta-Gainesville;

Atlanta-Bremen;

Atlanta-Canton;

Atlanta-Cartersville;

Jesup-Waycross-Jacksonville, Florida;

Gainesville-Greenville, South Carolina;

Albany-Tallahassee, Florida;

Bremen-Birmingham, Alabama; and

Atlanta-Chattanooga, Tennessee.

Nothing in this Code section shall preclude or delay state involvement in the planning and development of high speed rail for the Atlanta to Chattanooga, Tennessee, railway passenger service corridor, should federal or private funds be made available for such high speed rail.

For the purposes of this subsection, “high speed rail” is defined as involving trains traveling at maximum speeds in excess of 110 miles per hour.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-9-290

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1699, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, the subsection designations were added, paragraph designations were added in subsection (b), and “subsection” was substituted for “provision” in paragraph (b)(2).

46-9-291.
Planning and development.

Any and all railway passenger service plans or programs of any and all state departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, commissions, or authorities having responsibility for the same shall be conducted and coordinated so as to conform planning and development of service to the railway passenger service corridors of the program provided by this article. It is the intent of the General Assembly that planning and development of railway passenger service shall include every metropolitan statistical area of the state to the extent that revenues of the state for such planning or development are made available from either dedicated revenue sources or the general fund.

Any state department, agency, board, bureau, commission, or authority having responsibility for any railway passenger service planning or programming may recommend any additional railway passenger service corridor or corridors to the General Assembly for inclusion in the Designated Georgia Rail Passenger Corridors after completion of a feasibility study for such proposed additional railway passenger service corridor or corridors, but no additional railway passenger service corridor shall be studied for inclusion unless federal or state funding is made available for such study. No railway passenger service corridor shall be a part of the Designated Georgia Rail Passenger Corridors unless and until it is included in the list provided by Code Section 46-9-290.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-9-291

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1699, § 2.